04_Morphology/turkish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
%<N%> %<Plu%> %<Nom%> %<Acc%> %<Dat%> %<Loc%> %<Gen%> %<Abl%> %<Px1Sg%> %<Px2Sg%> %<Px3Sg%> %<Px1Pl%> %<Px2Pl%> %<Px3Pl%>

%>

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
ev:ev N ;
kitap:kitap N ;
köpek:köpek N ;
çocuk:çocuk N ;
araba:araba N ;
ağaç:ağaç N ;
deniz:deniz N ;
kedi:kedi N ;
yol:yol N ;
elma:elma N ;
sandalye:sandalye N ;
okul:okul N ;
bilgisayar:bilgisayar N ;
gözlük:gözlük N ;
çiçek:çiçek N ;
şehir: şehir N ;
nehir:nehir N ;
televizyon:televizyon N ;
telefon: telefon N ;
pencere:pencere N ;

LEXICON N
Poss ;
%<Plu%>:%>l{A}r Poss ;

LEXICON Poss
CASE ;
%<Px1Sg%>:%>%{I%}%{m%} CASE ;
%<Px2Sg%>:%>%{I%}%{n%} CASE;
%<Px3Sg%>:%>%{I%} CASE;
%<Px1Pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z CASE;
%<Px2Pl%>:%>%{I%}n%{I%}z CASE;
%<Px3Pl%>:%>%l%{A%}ri CASE;

LEXICON CASE
%<Nom%>: # ;
%<Acc%>:%>%{I%} #;
%<Dat%>:%>%{N%}%{A%} #;
%<Loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} #;
%<Abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{N%} #;
%<Gen%>:%>%{I%}%{N%} #;



END
